src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Vinfl-Common

+Aori:%>н%{А%} # ;
+Aori+Neg:%>%{а%}хгүй Clit ; ! can take юу/юү, but can it take вэ?
+Aori:%{а%}х Clit-Qst ;

+Pst:%>с%{а%}н Clit ;
+Pst+Neg:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}гүй Clit ;
+Pst:%>%{а%}в # ;  ! FIXME: figure this out

+Pst+Evi:жээ # ;

+Ifi:%>л%{А1%}%{А2%} # ;
+Hab:%>д%{а%}г Clit ;

+Ger:%>%{а%}х Cases-Normal ;
+Ger_Imp:%>д%{а%}г Cases-Normal ;
+Ger:%>с%{а%}н Cases-Normal ;

+Gna:%>%{а%}%{Ж%} # ;
+Gna_imp:%>%{а%}н # ;
+Gna_Prf:%>%{г%}%{А1%}%{А2%}д # ;
+Cna_Cnd:%>%{В%}%{А%}л # ;
+Cna_Cnd:%>%{Т%}%{А%}л # ;

+Imp:%>%{А1%}%{А2%}р%{А%}й # ;     ! simple imperative
+Sug:%>%{А1%}%{А2%}ч # ;           ! suggestion

LEXICON Vinfl-TV

+V+TV: Vinfl-Common ;

LEXICON Vinfl-IV

+V+IV: Vinfl-Common ;
