src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs

бол Vinfl-IV ; ! "be"
бай Vinfl-IV ; ! "be"
үз Vinfl-TV ; ! "see"
хар:хар%{ъ%} Vinfl-TV ; ! "look at"
гэ Vinfl-IV ; ! "say" / quotative marker
ав Vinfl-TV ; ! "take"
ир:ир%{ъ%} Vinfl-IV ; ! "come"
яв:яв%{ъ%} Vinfl-IV ; ! "go"
оч:оч Vinfl-IV ; ! "go"
өг Vinfl-TV ; ! "give"
тэг Vinfl-IV ; ! "do such"
ингэ Vinfl-IV ; ! "do thus"
барь:барь Vinfl-TV ; ! "grab"
сонс Vinfl-IV ; ! "listen"  FIXME: IV/TV?
бос Vinfl-IV ; ! "stand"
чад Vinfl-IV ; ! "be able to" FIXME: IV/TV?
ярь:ярь Vinfl-IV ; ! "speak"
гар:гар Vinfl-IV ; ! "leave"
ол Vinfl-TV ; ! "find"
хай Vinfl-TV ; ! "look for"
март Vinfl-TV ; ! "forget"
тавь:тавь Vinfl-TV ; ! "put"
хий Vinfl-TV ; ! "do/make/put in"
хэл Vinfl-IV ; ! "say"
хүр:хүр Vinfl-TV ; ! "reach"
амьдар Vinfl-IV ; ! "live"
ажилл Vinfl-IV ; ! "work"
эхэл Vinfl-IV ; ! "begin"
дуус Vinfl-IV ; ! "finish"
гар:гар Vinfl-IV ; ! "leave"
ор:ор%{ъ%} Vinfl-IV ; ! "go/come in, enter"
зар:зар%{ъ%} Vinfl-TV; ! "announce for sale" ??
зориул:зориул Vinfl-TV ; ! "dedicate"
үйлд:үйлд Vinfl-TV ; ! "create"
ид:ид Vinfl-TV ; ! "eat"
сан:сан Vinfl-TV ; ! "miss"
боль:боль Vinfl-TV ; ! "stop, halt, bring to an end"
шинж:шинж Vinfl-TV ; ! "investigate" ?
зас:зас Vinfl-TV ; ! "fix"
холб:холб Vinfl-IV ; ! "tie, connect" - takes comm objects
сонго:сонго Vinfl-TV ; ! "choose"
ойлго:ойлго Vinfl-TV ; ! "understand"
бүтээ:бүтээ Vinfl-TV ; ! "create"  ! Use/MT
уу:уу Vinfl-TV ; ! "drink"
мэд:мэд Vinfl-TV ; ! "know"
хэмээ:хэмээ Vinfl-TV ; ! "say (literary)"
суу:суу Vinfl-IV ; ! "sit"
оролц:оролц Vinfl-IV ; ! "catch up, step in"
тогл:тогл Vinfl-IV ; ! "play"
бий% бол:бий% бол Vinfl-IV ; ! "come into being"
